Maine, session 132, LD1806.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 13-B MRSA §1301, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2007, c. 323, Pt. B,
§27 and affected by Pt. G, §4, is further amended to read:
C. The names and business or residence addresses, of the president, the treasurer, the
registered agent, the secretary or clerk, and directors of the domestic or foreign
corporation, including the street or rural route number, town or city and state;
Sec. 2. 13-B MRSA §1301, sub-§1, ¶D, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 323, Pt. B, §27
and affected by Pt. G, §4, is amended to read:
D. A brief statement of the character of the activities in which the domestic or foreign
corporation is actually engaged in this State, if any; and
Sec. 3. 13-B MRSA §1301, sub-§1, ¶E, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 323, Pt. B, §27
and affected by Pt. G, §4, is amended to read:
E. The address of its principal office, wherever located.; and
Sec. 4. 13-B MRSA §1301, sub-§1, ¶F is enacted to read:
F. Whether the domestic or foreign corporation has a purpose to provide one or more
residential rental units.
Sec. 5. 13-B MRSA §1301, sub-§4, as repealed and replaced by PL 1993, c. 680,
Pt. A, §23, is amended to read:
4. Filing. Subject to rules adopted under section 1302‑A, subsection 4, the annual
report must be delivered for filing to the Secretary of State or a designee. The annual
reports may be delivered to the Secretary of State on a staggered basis as defined by the
Secretary of State by rule in accordance with the Maine Administrative Procedure Act. The
report must apply to the 12-month period specified by the Secretary of State. Proof to the
satisfaction of the Secretary of State that the report was deposited in the United States mail
in a sealed envelope, properly addressed and with postage prepaid, before the date that
penalties become effective for late delivery of annual reports, as established by the
Secretary of State by rule, is considered compliance with this subsection. One copy of the
report, together with the filing fee required by this Act, must be delivered for filing to the
Secretary of State, who shall file the report if the Secretary of State finds that it conforms
to the requirements of this Act. If the Secretary of State finds that the report does not
conform, the Secretary of State shall promptly mail or otherwise return the report to the
domestic or foreign corporation for necessary corrections, in which event the penalties
prescribed by this Act for failure to file the report within the time provided in this section
do not apply if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of this Act and
returned to the Secretary of State within 30 days from the date on which it was mailed or
otherwise returned to the domestic or foreign corporation by the Secretary of State.
Sec. 6. 13-B MRSA §1301, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2007, c. 535, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by §7, is further amended to read:
5. Certificate of excuse. The Secretary of State, upon application by a domestic or
foreign corporation and satisfactory proof that it has ceased to carry on activities, shall file
a certificate of that fact and shall give a duplicate certificate to the domestic or foreign
corporation. The domestic or foreign corporation is then excused from filing annual reports
Page 1 - 132LR2072(01)

413 with the Secretary of State as long as the domestic or foreign corporation carries on no
424 activities. The name of a domestic or foreign corporation remains in the Secretary of
435 State's record of corporate names and is protected for a period of 5 years following the
446 filing of the certificate under this subsection.
Sec. 7. 13-B MRSA §1301, sub-§6, as repealed and replaced by PL 1993, c. 680,
Pt. A, §23, is amended to read:
6. Vote to carry on activities. The members entitled to vote or, if none, the directors
of a domestic or foreign corporation that has been excused pursuant to subsection 5 may
vote to resume carrying on activities at a meeting duly called and held for that purpose. A
certificate executed and filed as provided in sections 104 and 106, setting forth that a
members' or directors' meeting was held, the date and location of the meeting and that a
majority of the members or directors voted to resume carrying on activities, authorizes that
domestic or foreign corporation to carry on activities; after that certificate is filed, the
domestic or foreign corporation is required to file annual reports beginning with the next
reporting deadline following resumption as established by subsection 4.
Sec. 8. 13-B MRSA §1301, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Residential rental unit check box and form. Beginning January 1, 2026, the
Secretary of State shall provide on the annual report form filed by a domestic or foreign
corporation prescribed by the Secretary of State to comply with this section a check box
indicating whether a purpose of the domestic or foreign corporation is to provide one or
more residential rental units under subsection 1, paragraph F. Beginning January 1, 2027,
the Secretary of State shall include with the annual report form a form requesting from a
domestic or foreign corporation that checked the residential rental unit check box under
this subsection information required under Title 14, section 6030-K, subsection 2.
Sec. 9. 13-C MRSA §1621, sub-§1, ¶G, as amended by PL 2021, c. 385, §2, is
further amended to read:
G. The names of its directors, except that in the case of a domestic or foreign
corporation that has eliminated its board of directors pursuant to section 743 the annual
report must set forth the names of the shareholders instead;
Sec. 10. 13-C MRSA §1621, sub-§1, ¶H, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 385, §2, is
amended to read:
H. An indication as to whether the domestic or foreign corporation is publicly held;
Sec. 11. 13-C MRSA §1621, sub-§1, ¶I, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 385, §2, is
amended to read:
I. An indication of how many female directors are on the board of directors of the
publicly held domestic or foreign corporation; and
Sec. 12. 13-C MRSA §1621, sub-§1, ¶J, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 385, §2, is
amended to read:
J. An indication as to whether the domestic publicly held or foreign corporation has
the minimum number of female directors on its board of directors required by section
803, subsection 4.; and
Sec. 13. 13-C MRSA §1621, sub-§1, ¶K is enacted to read:
Page 2 - 132LR2072(01)

K. An indication as to whether the domestic or foreign corporation has a purpose to
provide one or more residential rental units.
Sec. 14. 13-C MRSA §1621, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2003, c. 344, Pt. B, §134,
is further amended to read:
4. Certificate of excuse. The Secretary of State, upon application by any domestic or
foreign corporation and satisfactory proof that it has ceased to transact business and that it
is not indebted to this State for failure to file an annual report and to pay any fees or
penalties accrued, shall file a certificate of the fact and shall give a duplicate certificate to
the domestic or foreign corporation, after which the domestic or foreign corporation is
excused from filing annual reports with the Secretary of State, as long as the domestic or
foreign corporation in fact transacts no business. The name of a domestic or foreign
corporation remains in the Secretary of State's records of corporate names and is protected
for a period of 5 years following excuse.
Sec. 15. 13-C MRSA §1621, sub-§5, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 640, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by Pt. B, §7, is amended to read:
5. Resume transaction of business. The shareholders of a domestic or foreign
corporation that has been excused from filing annual reports pursuant to subsection 4 may
vote to resume transacting business at a meeting duly called and held for that purpose. A
certificate executed and filed as provided in section 121 setting forth that a shareholders'
meeting was held, the date and location of same, and that a majority of the shareholders
voted to resume transacting business authorizes that domestic or foreign corporation to
transact business; and after that certificate is filed, the domestic or foreign corporation is
required to file annual reports beginning with the next reporting deadline following
resumption.
Sec. 16. 13-C MRSA §1621, sub-§7 is enacted to read:
7. Residential rental unit check box and form. Beginning January 1, 2026, the
Secretary of State shall provide on the annual report form filed by a domestic or foreign
corporation prescribed by the Secretary of State to comply with this section a check box
indicating whether a purpose of the domestic or foreign corporation is to provide one or
more residential rental units under subsection 1, paragraph K. Beginning January 1, 2027,
the Secretary of State shall include with the annual report form a form requesting from a
domestic or foreign corporation that checked the residential rental unit check box under
this subsection information required under Title 14, section 6030-K, subsection 2.
Sec. 17. 14 MRSA §6001, sub-§9 is enacted to read:
9. Failure to register. A person required to register a residential rental unit under
section 6030-K may not serve a notice of termination under this section to a tenant for
nonpayment of rent if the person has not registered the tenant's residential rental unit under
section 6030-K. A person may not serve notice of termination under this section for
nonpayment of rent sooner than 120 days after the person has registered the unit of the
tenant being served under section 6030-K. A person that serves notice of termination to a
tenant in violation of this subsection commits a civil violation for which a penalty in the
amount of 3 times the monthly rent of the tenant's residential rental unit must be adjudged.
Sec. 18. 14 MRSA §6004, sub-§2, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 316, §1, is
amended to read:
Page 3 - 132LR2072(01)

F. A statement that either party may request, or the court may at any time refer the
parties to, mediation on any issue; and
Sec. 19. 14 MRSA §6004, sub-§2, ¶G, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 316, §1, is
amended to read:
G. A court-approved form to request mediation.; and
Sec. 20. 14 MRSA §6004, sub-§2, ¶H is enacted to read:
H. A statement that a landlord may not serve notice of termination for nonpayment of
rent if the landlord has not registered the residential rental unit of the tenant with the
state residential rental unit registry under section 6030-K, subsection 1 and that a
person that violates this provision commits a civil violation for which a penalty in the
amount of 3 times the monthly rent of the tenant's residential rental unit must be
adjudged.
Sec. 21. 14 MRSA §6030-K is enacted to read:
§6030-K. Residential rental unit registry
1. Residential rental unit registry. The Secretary of State shall publish on a publicly
accessible website a searchable database of affordable residential rental units that includes
a residential rental unit registry. For purposes of this section, "residential rental unit" means
a unit of housing rented for residential purposes for a period of more than 30 days.
2. Information required. An owner of a residential rental unit in the State shall
register annually with the Secretary of State for inclusion in the residential rental unit
registry under subsection 1 in a form or manner determined by the Secretary of State. The
owner shall provide the following information:
A. The name, e-mail address and telephone number of the owner of the residential
rental unit;
B. The name, e-mail address and telephone number of the manager or management
company of the residential rental unit or registered agent of the owner if the owner is
not directly involved with the administration or management of the residential rental
unit;
C. The name, e-mail address and telephone number of any entity that has a parental or
subsidiary relationship with the owner of the residential rental unit and is registered
with the Secretary of State or another agency;
D. Emergency contact information of the owner of the residential rental unit if different
from paragraph A or B;
E. The physical address of the residential rental unit for enhanced 9-1-1 services as
defined in Title 25, section 2921, subsection 6;
F. The mailing address of the residential rental unit if different from the physical
address under paragraph E;
G. If the owner owns a property with multiple residential rental units, the total number
of residential rental units on each property of the owner, including the number of
occupied residential rental units at the time of registration; and
Page 4 - 132LR2072(01)

H. If the owner owns a property with multiple residential rental units, the total number
of residential rental units on each property of the owner not available for occupancy,
whether under construction or under renovation.
3. Registration fee. The Secretary of State shall charge an initial registration fee for
inclusion in the residential rental unit registry under subsection 1 that reasonably covers
the expenses to administer the registry. A registration fee is not required if:
A. The owner of the residential rental unit owns 10 or fewer residential rental units in
the State, including a residential rental unit owned by an entity that has a parental or
subsidiary relationship with the owner;
B. The residential rental unit is subsidized by the State Government or Federal
Government; or
C. The residential rental unit is subject to a rent restriction under a federal, state or
local law, rule, regulation or ordinance.
The Secretary of State shall adopt routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A to carry out the purposes of this subsection.
4. Secretary of State responsibilities. The Secretary of State shall:
A. Provide a publicly accessible online portal or form for an owner of a residential
rental unit to submit the registration information required under subsection 2;
B. Provide a publicly accessible, searchable database of residential rental units; and
C. Develop a process by which a municipality can receive residential rental unit data
pertaining to that municipality from the Secretary of State.
Sec. 22. 31 MRSA §873, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2007, c. 323, Pt. E, §§38 to
40 and affected by Pt. G, §4, is further amended to read:
1. Annual report. Each registered limited liability partnership and each foreign
limited liability partnership authorized to do business in this State shall file, within the time
prescribed by this chapter, an annual report setting forth:
A. The name of the registered or foreign limited liability partnership;
A-1. The jurisdiction of organization of the registered or foreign limited liability
partnership;
B. The information required by Title 5, section 105, subsection 1;
C. A brief statement of the character of the business in which the registered or foreign
limited liability partnership is actually engaged in this State, if any; and
D. The street address of the partnership's chief executive office, the street address of
an office of the partnership in this State and the name and street address of the contact
partner.; and
E. Whether the registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability
partnership has a purpose to provide one or more residential rental units.
Sec. 23. 31 MRSA §873, sub-§3, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 633, Pt. B, §1, is
amended to read:
Page 5 - 132LR2072(01)

C. One copy of the report, together with the filing fee required by this chapter, must
be delivered for filing to the Secretary of State, who shall file the report if the Secretary
of State finds that it conforms to the requirements of this chapter. If the Secretary of
State finds that it does not conform, the Secretary of State shall promptly mail or
otherwise return the report to the registered or foreign limited liability partnership for
any necessary correction.
Sec. 24. 31 MRSA §873, sub-§3, ¶D, as enacted by PL 1995, c. 633, Pt. B, §1, is
amended to read:
D. The penalties prescribed by this chapter for failure to file the report within the time
provided in this section do not apply if the report is corrected to conform to the
requirements of this chapter and returned to the Secretary of State within 30 days from
the date on which the report was mailed or otherwise returned to the registered or
foreign limited liability partnership by the Secretary of State.
Sec. 25. 31 MRSA §873, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Residential rental unit check box and form. Beginning January 1, 2026, the
Secretary of State shall provide on the annual report form filed by a registered limited
liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership prescribed by the Secretary of
State to comply with this section a check box indicating whether a purpose of the registered
limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership is to provide one or more
residential rental units under subsection 1, paragraph E. Beginning January 1, 2027, the
Secretary of State shall include with the annual report form a form requesting from a
registered limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership that checked
the residential rental unit check box under this subsection information required under Title
14, section 6030-K, subsection 2.
Sec. 26. 31 MRSA §1330, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 323, Pt. F, §15
and affected by Pt. G, §4, is further amended to read:
A. The annual report must set forth:
(1) The name of the domestic or foreign limited partnership;
(1-A) The jurisdiction of organization of the domestic or foreign limited
partnership;
(2) The information required by Title 5, section 105, subsection 1;
(3) A brief statement of the character of the business in which the domestic or
foreign limited partnership is actually engaged in this State, if any;
(4) The name and business or residence address of each general partner, including
the street or rural route number, town or city and state; and
(5) The address of its principal office, wherever located.; and
(6) Whether the domestic or foreign limited partnership has a purpose to provide
one or more residential rental units.
Sec. 27. 31 MRSA §1330, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 543, Pt. C, §2,
is amended to read:
Page 6 - 132LR2072(01)

C. The annual report must be executed and signed by a general partner or any other
duly authorized individual. Subject to rules adopted under section 1456, the report must
be delivered to the Secretary of State or a designee for filing. Proof to the satisfaction
of the Secretary of State that, prior to the date that penalties become effective for late
delivery of annual reports as established by the Secretary of State by rule, the report
was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed, with
postage prepaid, or delivered by electronic means as provided by the Secretary of State,
is deemed a compliance with this requirement. One copy of the report, together with
the filing fee required by this chapter, must be delivered for filing to the Secretary of
State, who shall file the report if the Secretary of State finds that it conforms to the
requirements of this chapter. If the Secretary of State finds that the report does not so
conform, the Secretary of State shall promptly mail or otherwise return the report to
the domestic or foreign limited partnership for any necessary corrections. The penalties
prescribed by this chapter for failure to file the report within the time provided in this
section do not apply if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of this
chapter and returned to the Secretary of State within 30 days from the date on which it
was so mailed or otherwise returned to the domestic or foreign limited partnership by
the Secretary of State.
Sec. 28. 31 MRSA §1330, sub-§3, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 543, Pt. C, §2, is
amended to read:
3. Failure to file annual report; penalty. A domestic or foreign limited partnership
that is required to deliver an annual report for filing as provided in subsection 1 that fails
to deliver its properly completed annual report to the Secretary of State shall pay, in
addition to the regular annual report fee, the late filing penalty described in section 1460,
subsection 19, as long as the report is received by the Secretary of State prior to revocation
or administrative dissolution. Upon a domestic or foreign limited partnership's failure to
file the annual report and to pay the annual report fee or the penalty, the Secretary of State,
notwithstanding Title 4, chapter 5 and Title 5, chapter 375, shall revoke a foreign limited
partnership's authority to do business in this State and administratively dissolve a domestic
limited partnership. The Secretary of State shall use the procedures set forth in section 1399
to administratively dissolve a domestic limited partnership and the procedure set forth in
section 1416 to revoke a foreign limited partnership's authority to transact business in this
State. A domestic limited partnership that has been administratively dissolved under
section 1399 must follow the requirements set forth in section 1400 to reinstate.
A. If the Secretary of State finds that any annual report of a domestic or foreign limited
partnership delivered for filing does not conform with the requirements of subsection
1, the report must be returned for correction.
B. If the annual report of a domestic or foreign limited partnership is not delivered for
filing within the time specified in subsection 1, the domestic or foreign limited
partnership is excused from the liability provided in this section and from any other
penalty for failure to file timely the report if it establishes, to the satisfaction of the
Secretary of State, that failure to file was the result of excusable neglect and it furnishes
the Secretary of State a copy of the report within 30 days after it learns that the
Secretary of State failed to receive the original report.
Sec. 29. 31 MRSA §1330, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
Page 7 - 132LR2072(01)

4. Residential rental unit check box and form. Beginning January 1, 2026, the
Secretary of State shall provide on the annual report form filed by a domestic or foreign
limited partnership prescribed by the Secretary of State to comply with this section a check
box indicating whether a purpose of the domestic or foreign limited partnership is to
provide one or more residential rental units under subsection 1, paragraph A, subparagraph
6. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Secretary of State shall include with the annual report
form a form requesting from a domestic or foreign limited partnership that checked the
residential rental unit check box under this subsection information required under Title 14,
section 6030-K, subsection 2.
Sec. 30. 31 MRSA §1665, as amended by PL 2011, c. 113, Pt. B, §§8 to 10, is
further amended to read:
§1665. Annual report for Secretary of State
1. Annual report. Each year, each limited liability company or each foreign limited
liability company authorized to conduct business in this State shall deliver to the office of
the Secretary of State for filing an annual report setting forth:
A. The name of the limited liability company or the foreign limited liability company;
B. The information required by Title 5, section 105, subsection 1;
C. The address of the limited liability company's or foreign limited liability company's
principal office;
D. A brief statement of the character of the business in which the limited liability
company is actually engaged in this State; and
E. The name and address of at least one person who is a member, manager or other
authorized person of the limited liability company.; and
F. Whether the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company has a
purpose to provide one or more residential rental units.
2. Current information. Information in an annual report under this section must be
current as of the date the report is delivered to the office of the Secretary of State for filing.
3. First annual report; subsequent reports. The first annual report under this section
must be delivered to the office of the Secretary of State between January 1st and June 1st
of the year following the calendar year in which a limited liability company was formed or
a foreign limited liability company delivered its statement of foreign qualification to the
office of the Secretary of State for filing. For subsequent years, annual reports must be
delivered to the office of the Secretary of State between January 1st and June 1st of the
following calendar year.
4. Filing. The report, together with the filing fee required by this chapter, must be
delivered for filing to the office of the Secretary of State, who shall file the report if the
Secretary of State finds that it conforms to the requirements of subsection 1. If the Secretary
of State finds that the report does not conform to the requirements of subsection 1, the
Secretary of State shall promptly mail or otherwise return the report to the reporting limited
liability company for any necessary correction. If the report is corrected to contain the
information required in subsection 1 and delivered to the office of the Secretary of State
within 30 days after the effective date of the notice, it is timely delivered. Proof to the
satisfaction of the Secretary of State that, prior to the date that penalties become effective
Page 8 - 132LR2072(01)

414 for late delivery of an annual report as established by the Secretary of State by rule, the
425 report was deposited in the United States mail in a sealed envelope, properly addressed,
436 with postage prepaid or was delivered in a medium authorized by the Secretary of State is
447 deemed in compliance with this requirement. The penalties prescribed by this chapter for
458 failure to file the report by the date required by rule by the Secretary of State do not apply
469 if the report is corrected to conform to the requirements of this chapter and returned to the
570 Secretary of State within 30 days from the date on which the report was mailed or otherwise
581 returned to the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company by the
592 Secretary of State.
5. Certificate of excuse. The Secretary of State, upon application by a limited liability
company or foreign limited liability company and satisfactory proof that it has ceased to
transact business and that it is not indebted to this State for failure to file an annual report
and to pay any fees or penalties accrued, shall file a certificate of the fact and shall give a
duplicate certificate to the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company,
after which the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company is excused
from filing annual reports with the office of the Secretary of State, as long as the limited
liability company or foreign limited liability company in fact transacts no business. The
name of a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company remains in the
office of the Secretary of State's records of entity names and is protected for a period of 5
years following excuse.
6. Resumption of business. A limited liability company or foreign limited liability
company that has been excused from filing annual reports pursuant to subsection 5 may
elect to resume transacting business. A certificate executed and filed as provided in section
1673 setting forth that an election was made to resume the transaction of business
authorizes the limited liability company or foreign limited liability company to resume
transaction of business. After that certificate is filed, the limited liability company or
foreign limited liability company is required to file annual reports beginning with the next
reporting deadline following resumption.
7. Residential rental unit check box and form. Beginning January 1, 2026, the
Secretary of State shall provide on the annual report form filed by a limited liability
company or foreign limited liability company prescribed by the Secretary of State to
comply with this section a check box indicating whether a purpose of the limited liability
company or foreign limited liability company is to provide one or more residential rental
units under subsection 1, paragraph F. Beginning January 1, 2027, the Secretary of State
shall include with the annual report form a form requesting from a limited liability company
or foreign limited liability company that checked the residential rental unit check box under
this subsection information required under Title 14, section 6030-K, subsection 2.
Sec. 31. Secretary of State to calculate registration fee. By January 1, 2028,
the Secretary of State shall calculate the residential rental unit registry registration fee under
the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 14, section 6030-K, subsection 3, to cover start-up and
administrative expenses of the residential rental unit registry under Title 14, section 6030-K
based upon the number of entities that mark the check box under Title 13-B, section 1301,
subsection 7; Title 13-C, section 1621, subsection 7; Title 31, section 873, subsection 4;
Title 31, section 1330, subsection 4; and Title 31, section 1665, subsection 7.
Page 9 - 132LR2072(01)

Sec. 32. Effective date. Those sections of this Act that enact the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 14, section 6001, subsection 9; Title 14, section 6004, subsection 2,
paragraph H; and Title 14, section 6030-K take effect January 1, 2028.